Mississippi, session 2026, SB2640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 69-5-114, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 69-5-114.  In any livestock facility constructed, renovated or expanded with funds from the grant program authorized under Section 18, Chapter 530, Laws of 1995, and the Mississippi Trade Mart, Mississippi Coliseum, Kirk Fordice Equine Center, Mississippi State Fairgrounds and related livestock and equine barns, stalls and all other facilities, the members of the Future Farmers of America, the 4-H Club, the Junior Livestock Association, the Mississippi Cattlemen's Association and the United States Pony Club, Inc., may hold up to three (3) animal or livestock shows * * * or, sales or other events per year per facility at no charge for use of the facility or for utilities. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.